Utah statutes.
23-20-23.   Aiding or assisting violation unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to aid or assist any other person to violate any provisions of this code or any rules or regulations promulgated under it. The penalty for violating this section is the same as for the provision or regulation for which aid or assistance is given.

